District of Columbia statutes.
31-1631.04

Licensure.

(a)

The Commissioner shall issue a license to an applicant for a public insurance adjuster’s license who:

(1)

Has paid the applicable fee established by the Commissioner by rule;

(2)

Passes a written examination for which a fee may be charged; and

(3)

Has sufficient experience, training, and instruction concerning the adjusting of first party claims for damages or losses under insurance contracts that insure the real or personal property of the insured, as determined by the Commissioner in accordance with regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

(b)

The Commissioner may issue a license to any applicant without an examination if:

(1)

The applicant holds a like license in good standing from another state and the public official having supervision of public insurance adjusters in the other state certifies that the applicant has passed a written examination; and

(2)

The other state recognizes public insurance adjusters with District public insurance adjuster licenses for the purpose of licensing the applicant without the requirement of an examination.

(c)

A license issued pursuant to this section shall continue in force from the date of issuance until April 30th of the next odd-numbered year, unless suspended, revoked, or otherwise terminated prior thereto. Requests for renewal of the license shall be made to the Commissioner and accompanied by the license fee. Unless a request for renewal, accompanied by the appropriate fee, is received by the termination date, the license shall expire.

History

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-256, § 4, 50 DCR 238
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2172, 57 DCR 6242

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-223, in subsec. (a)(1), substituted “established by the Commissioner by rule” for “specified by this chapter”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2172 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Short Title

Short title: Section 2171 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle N of title II of the act may be cited as the “Public Insurance Adjuster Licensure Amendment Act of 2010”.